District of Columbia statutes.
10-703

Inspection of public buildings for lead paint — Appropriations.

(a)

There is hereby authorized to be appropriated from the funds available to the government of the District of Columbia in the budget an amount not to exceed $1,120,000 for the fiscal year commencing on October 1, 1978, to carry out the purposes of this section and § 10-702; provided, however, that grant funds available to the government of the District of Columbia may be expended to carry out the purposes of this section and § 10-702 without regard to any limitation in this section.

(b)

In each fiscal year commencing on or after October 1, 1979, $50,000 are authorized to be appropriated to carry out this section and § 10-702; provided, that authorization is hereby granted to expend funds in any fiscal year commencing on or after October 1, 1979, up to the amount authorized in subsection (a) of this section but not appropriated in the fiscal year commencing on October 1, 1978.

History

Oct. 26, 1977, D.C. Law 2-28, § 3, 24 DCR 3721

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-303.
1973 Ed., § 9-503.